Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1927.01
Suicide awareness and prevention training requirements.

The department shall establish standardized suicide awareness and prevention training requirements for all employees of a child-placing agency prior to any independent contact with youth and families. Such training shall incorporate a baseline of curriculum materials described in section 68-1207.02 while also allowing a child-placing agency to incorporate training elements that meet the specific needs of the individual agency. The department may approve the existing curriculum of a child-placing agency if such curriculum meets the baseline of curriculum pursuant to section 68-1207.02.

Laws 2025, LB217, § 5.